Washington statutes.
RCW 43.52.383

Compliance with open public meetings act.

(1) The legislature intends that the business and deliberations of joint operating agencies conducted by their boards of directors, executive boards, committees and subcommittees be conducted openly and with opportunity for public input.

(2) The board of directors, executive board, and all committees or subcommittees thereof shall comply with the provisions of chapter 42.30 RCW, in order to assure adequate public input and awareness of decisions.

[ 1983 1st ex.s. c 3 s 4.]